Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-839
Certificated employees; assignment rights.

Sections 79-824 to 79-842 do not provide any certificated employee a right to a specific assignment so long as such certificated employee is assigned to duties for which he or she is qualified by reason of certification, endorsement, or college preparation.

Laws 1982, LB 259, § 15;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-12,121;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 469.